Colorado, session 2026A, SB174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add (1)(tttt)
as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(tttt) VIOLATES SECTION 6-1-741.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-741 as
follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

6-1-741. Lead generation legal marketing - deceptive trade
practice - enforcement - penalties - rules - definitions - legislative
declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) CONSISTENT WITH RULES ADOPTED BY THE COLORADO SUPREME
COURT REGARDING THE PRACTICE OF LAW BY ATTORNEYS AND LICENSED
LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONALS, TRADITIONAL LEGAL MARKETING ALLOWS
ATTORNEYS AND LAW FIRMS TO ADVERTISE THEIR SERVICES WHILE CLEARLY
IDENTIFYING THEMSELVES AND ALLOWING CONSUMERS TO MAKE INFORMED
DECISIONS REGARDING THEIR LEGAL REPRESENTATION;
(b) LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING FOR LEGAL SERVICES
INVOLVES THIRD PARTIES THAT SOLICIT CONSUMERS WHO MAY NEED LEGAL
SERVICES BY OBTAINING THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL INFORMATION AND
INFORMATION ABOUT THE CONSUMER'S LEGAL ISSUE AND THEN SELLING
THAT INFORMATION TO ATTORNEYS OR LAW FIRMS;
(c) LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING FOR LEGAL SERVICES IS
INHERENTLY MISLEADING TO CONSUMERS BECAUSE THE PERSON
CONDUCTING THE LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING PURPORTS TO BE AN
ATTORNEY OR REPRESENTATIVE FROM A LAW FIRM BUT IS ACTUALLY NOT AN
ATTORNEY OR LAW-FIRM REPRESENTATIVE;
(d) LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING FIRMS TYPICALLY USE
"BAIT-AND-SWITCH" TACTICS, "LOOK-ALIKE" ADVERTISING, IMPERSONATION,
FRAUD, AND OTHER DECEPTIVE ADVERTISING PRACTICES TO TARGET INJURED
OR VULNERABLE CONSUMERS WHO ARE IN NEED OF LEGAL REPRESENTATION;
(e) LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING ALSO MISLEADS THE
ATTORNEYS OR LAW FIRMS THAT PURCHASE THE CONSUMER INFORMATION
FROM THE LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING ORGANIZATION BECAUSE
THE CONSUMER INFORMATION IS OFTEN SOLD TO MULTIPLE FIRMS, THE
INFORMATION IS ERRONEOUS, OR THE INFORMATION DOES NOT REPRESENT
A VIABLE LEGAL CASE;
(f) BECAUSE OF THE HARM THAT LEAD GENERATION LEGAL
MARKETING CAN HAVE ON CONSUMERS, ATTORNEYS, AND THE LEGAL
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-174

PROFESSION, IT IS IMPERATIVE THAT THIS PRACTICE BE PROHIBITED IN THE
STATE AND ENFORCED THROUGH CIVIL AND CRIMINAL PENALTIES;
(g) CIVIL AND CRIMINAL VIOLATIONS RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF
LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING ARE CAPABLE OF BEING ENFORCED BY
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE STATE'S DISTRICT ATTORNEYS UNDER THE
"COLORADO CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT", ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 6, AND THE
COLORADO CRIMINAL CODE, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, CRIMINAL
IMPERSONATION, FRAUD, AND RACKETEERING; AND
(h) THEREFORE, IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF COLORADANS TO
PROHIBIT PERSONS THAT CONDUCT LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING
FOR LEGAL SERVICES FROM DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) (I) "LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING" MEANS ANY FORM OF
MARKETING IN WHICH AN ATTORNEY, LAW FIRM, OR LICENSED LEGAL
PARAPROFESSIONAL PAYS MONEY OR OTHER COMPENSATION TO A THIRD
PARTY TO RECEIVE INFORMATION ABOUT A POTENTIAL CLIENT OR CASE,
WHICH INFORMATION MAY INCLUDE THE POTENTIAL CLIENT'S CONTACT
INFORMATION OR INFORMATION ABOUT THE POTENTIAL CLIENT'S LEGAL
ISSUE.
(II) "LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING" INCLUDES MARKETING
IN WHICH COMPENSATION IS PROVIDED TO A THIRD PARTY DIRECTLY,
INDIRECTLY, ON A PER-LEAD OR PER-CASE BASIS, OR AS A SUBSCRIPTION
MODEL AND INCLUDES COMPENSATION MADE THROUGH INTERMEDIARIES,
AFFILIATES, OR OTHER ENTITIES.
(III) "LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING" DOES NOT INCLUDE
THE SHARING OF FEES BETWEEN LICENSED ATTORNEYS, LAW FIRMS, OR
LICENSED LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONALS SO LONG AS THE FEES ARE SHARED IN
COMPLIANCE WITH STATE LAW AND RULES ADOPTED BY THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT.
(b) (I) "TRADITIONAL LEGAL MARKETING" MEANS MARKETING DONE
BY AN ATTORNEY, LAW FIRM, OR LICENSED LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONAL, OR
BY A THIRD PARTY ON BEHALF OF AN ATTORNEY, LAW FIRM, OR LICENSED
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-174

LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONAL, DURING WHICH MARKETING THE ATTORNEY,
LAW FIRM, OR LICENSED LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONAL THAT IS ADVERTISING
THEIR SERVICES IS CLEARLY IDENTIFIED TO THE CONSUMER.
(II) "TRADITIONAL LEGAL MARKETING" INCLUDES, BUT IS NOT
LIMITED TO, SEARCH ENGINE OPTIMIZATION, PAY-PER-CLICK INTERNET
ADVERTISING, RADIO ADVERTISING, TELEVISION ADVERTISING, STREAMING
ADVERTISING, BILLBOARD ADVERTISING, AND LISTING IN LEGAL DIRECTORIES
IN WHICH THE NAME OR IDENTITY OF THE ATTORNEY, LAW FIRM, OR
LICENSED LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONAL IS CLEARLY DISCLOSED.
(3) CONSISTENT WITH RULES ADOPTED BY THE COLORADO SUPREME
COURT REGARDING THE PRACTICE OF LAW BY ATTORNEYS AND LICENSED
LEGAL PARAPROFESSIONALS, AND UNLESS A PERSON MEETS THE CRITERIA
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON SHALL NOT:
(a) PAY MONEY OR OTHER COMPENSATION FOR LEAD GENERATION
LEGAL MARKETING SERVICES IN THE STATE;
(b) ENGAGE IN THE PRACTICE OF LEAD GENERATION LEGAL
MARKETING IN THE STATE; OR
(c) SELL LEADS TO AN ATTORNEY, LAW FIRM, OR LICENSED LEGAL
PARAPROFESSIONAL IN THE STATE.
(4) A PERSON MAY SOLICIT A POTENTIAL CLIENT OR MARKET FOR
LEGAL SERVICES IN THE STATE IF THE PERSON IS:
(a) AUTHORIZED BY THE COLORADO SUPREME COURT TO PRACTICE
LAW IN THE STATE;
(b) WORKING ON BEHALF OF A PERSON AUTHORIZED BY THE
COLORADO SUPREME COURT TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE, AND THE
PERSON WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE OR THE LAW
FIRM OR BUSINESS FOR WHICH THE PERSON WORKS IS CLEARLY IDENTIFIED
IN ANY ADVERTISEMENT, MARKETING MATERIAL, INFORMATION, OR
RESOURCES; OR
(c) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT ENGAGES IN LEGAL SERVICES
IN THE STATE.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-174

(5) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A PERSON FROM ENGAGING IN
THE PRACTICE OF TRADITIONAL LEGAL MARKETING.
(6) (a) A COURT MAY ORDER INJUNCTIVE RELIEF IN A CIVIL ACTION
BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) AN ATTORNEY, LAW FIRM, OR LICENSED LEGAL
PARAPROFESSIONAL OR ANY CONSUMER WHO HAS BEEN AFFECTED BY LEAD
GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO ENFORCE
THIS SECTION.
(c) IF A PERSON IS HELD TO BE IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AS A
RESULT OF A CIVIL ACTION, THE CLAIMANT IS ENTITLED TO DAMAGES IN THE
AMOUNT OF TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION, PLUS REASONABLE
ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS.
(7) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A DISTRICT ATTORNEY MAY BRING
A CRIMINAL ACTION AGAINST A PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN THE PRACTICE OF
LEAD GENERATION LEGAL MARKETING IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR
DISTRICT ATTORNEY DETERMINES THAT THE PERSON'S ACTIONS CONSTITUTE
A CRIME PURSUANT TO THE COLORADO CRIMINAL CODE, INCLUDING:
(a) CRIMINAL IMPERSONATION, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-5-113;
(b) OFFENSES INVOLVING FRAUD, AS DESCRIBED IN ARTICLE 5 OF
TITLE 18;
(c) RACKETEERING ACTIVITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-17-103 (5);
OR
(d) ANY OTHER CRIME UNDER COLORADO LAW.
(8) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT ANY RULES NECESSARY TO
ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
(9) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT THE COLORADO SUPREME COURT'S
RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY, DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY, OR
ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF LAW IN THE STATE,
INCLUDING THE UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE OF LAW.
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-174

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-174

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-174